Wisconsin, session 2025, AB670.
do enact as follows:AB670,11Section 1. 77.54 (57d) (a) 2m. of the statutes is created to read:AB670,2,4277.54 (57d) (a) 2m. “Contract research services” means research conducted by 3a person on behalf of a customer that, if conducted by employees of the customer, 4would constitute qualified research.AB670,25Section 2. 77.54 (57d) (a) 4. of the statutes is renumbered 77.54 (57d) (a) 4. 6(intro.) and amended to read:AB670,2,9777.54 (57d) (a) 4. (intro.) “Qualified research” means qualified research as 8defined under section 41 (d) (1) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that it includes 9qualified all of the following:AB670,2,1110a. Qualified research that is funded by a member of a combined group for 11another member of a combined group.AB670,312Section 3. 77.54 (57d) (a) 4. b. of the statutes is created to read:AB670,2,141377.54 (57d) (a) 4. b. Qualified research that is funded by contract research 14expenses as defined under section 41 (b) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code.AB670,415Section 4. 77.54 (57d) (b) 4. of the statutes is created to read:AB670,2,161677.54 (57d) (b) 4. A person engaged in contract research services in this state.AB670,517Section 5. Effective date.AB670,2,1918(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 19publication.AB670,2,2020